Hawaii statutes.
§441-32.5 Sales contracts; filing with the
director. Every cemetery or pre-need funeral authority shall file with the
director a copy of all existing contract forms, and any new contract form prior
to its use, relating to the selling of cemetery property or pre-need services
and related commodities. The content of the contract shall be in conformance
with section 441-22.5(b). [L 1981, c 221, §23; am L 1985, c 101, §14]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next